Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-914
Department of Correctional Services; implementation of surplus and excess property plan.

The Department of Correctional Services shall be responsible for the implementation of a state plan to comply with Public Law 94-519 dealing with surplus and excess property.

Laws 1977, LB 548, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 536, § 3;

Laws 1982, LB 767, § 3.